Indiana, session 2026, HB1143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.6-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.239-2017,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 13. "Local taxpayer", as it relates to a
particular county, means any of the following:
(1) An individual who resides in that county on the date specified
in IC 6-3.6-8-3.
(2) An individual who:
(A) maintains the taxpayer's principal place of business or
employment in that county on the date specified in
IC 6-3.6-8-3 and who does not reside on that same date in
another county in Indiana in which a tax under this article is in
effect; or
(B) for purposes of section 19 of this chapter, maintains the
taxpayer's principal place of business or employment in
that county on the date specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3 and who
resides on that same date in another county in Indiana in
which a tax under this article is in effect.
2026 IN 1143—LS 6773/DI 134


(3) An individual who:
(A) has income apportioned to Indiana as:
(i) a team member under IC 6-3-2-2.7; or
(ii) a race team member under IC 6-3-2-3.2;
for services rendered in the county; and
(B) is not described in subdivision (1) or (2).
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.6-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 100, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 13. "Local taxpayer" means
any of the following:
(1) As it relates to a particular county (or municipality in the case
of a local income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22), an individual
who resides in that county (or municipality in the case of a local
income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22) on the date specified in
IC 6-3.6-8-3.
(2) As it relates to a particular county an individual who:
(A) maintains the taxpayer's principal place of business or
employment in that county on the date specified in
IC 6-3.6-8-3 and who does not reside on that same date in
another county in Indiana in which a tax under this article is in
effect; or
(B) for purposes of section 19 of this chapter, maintains the
taxpayer's principal place of business or employment in
that county on the date specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3 and who
resides on that same date in another county in Indiana in
which a tax under this article is in effect.
However, for purposes of a local income tax imposed by a
municipality under IC 6-3.6-6-22, the term does not include an
individual described in this subdivision.
(3) As it relates to a particular county, and only for purposes of a
rate imposed by a county under 6-3.6-6-2(b)(3), the term includes
an individual who:
(A) has income apportioned to Indiana as:
(i) a team member under IC 6-3-2-2.7; or
(ii) a race team member under IC 6-3-2-3.2;
for services rendered in the county; and
(B) is not described in subdivision (1) or (2).
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.6-2-19 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 19. (a) This section applies only to a local
taxpayer as defined in section 13 of this chapter.
(b) This section applies if a local taxpayer is obligated in the
2026 IN 1143—LS 6773/DI 134


same calendar year to pay:
(1) a local income tax in a county where the local taxpayer has
a principal place of business or employment; and
(2) a tax in a county where the local taxpayer resides.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the local
income tax rate in effect for a local taxpayer in the county where
the local taxpayer maintains the local taxpayer's principal place of
business or employment is twenty-five percent (25%) of the sum of
the local income tax rates imposed on the adjusted gross income of
local taxpayers who reside in the county where the local taxpayer
maintains the local taxpayer's principal place of business or
employment (excluding any rates imposed under IC 6-3.6-7).
(d) A local taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the tax
imposed by a county under subsection (c) in the county where the
local taxpayer resides.
(e) The amount of the credit is equal to the amount of the tax
paid under subsection (c) in the county where the local taxpayer
has a principal place of business or employment.
SECTION 4. [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027] (a) IC 6-3.6-2-19,
as added by this act, applies only to taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2026.
(b) This SECTION expires January 1, 2030.
2026 IN 1143—LS 6773/DI 134